Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5827.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 13n. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 333 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 333.10116(1) Pub ord E Purchasing or selling body part of deceased individual for transplantation or therapy 5 333.10117 Pub ord E Falsifying, concealing, or defacing document of anatomical gift for financial gain 5 333.10204(1) Pub ord F Transferring a human organ for valuable consideration 4 333.10204(4) Pub saf F Removal of a human organ by an unauthorized individual 4 333.10205 Pub saf F Removal of a human organ in an unapproved facility 4 333.13738(2) Pub saf F Waste disposal violations â subsequent offense 5 333.13738(3) Pub saf F Improper disposal of waste with indifference to human life 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Pub saf B Improper disposal of waste with extreme indifference to human life 20 333.16170(3) Pub trst F False representation of completion of health professional recovery program 4 333.16213a(3) Pub trst G Medical record â intentional omission of certain medical services â health professional 2 333.16279(5)(a) Person G Performing certain medical treatment on a minor â first offense 2 333.16279(5)(b) Person E Performing certain medical treatment on a minor â subsequent offense 5 333.16294 Pub saf F Unauthorized practice of health profession 4 333.17748d(2) Person G Compounding pharmacy violation 2 333.17748d(3) Person F Compounding pharmacy violation resulting in personal injury 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 333.17748d(4) Person E Compounding pharmacy violation resulting in serious impairment of a body function 5 333.17748d(5) Person C Compounding pharmacy violation resulting in death 15 333.17764(3) Pub saf G Adulterating, misbranding, removing, or substituting a drug or device 2 333.17764(4) Pub saf F Adulterating, misbranding, removing, or substituting a drug or device resulting in personal injury 4 333.17764(5) Pub saf E Adulterating, misbranding, removing, or substituting a drug or device resulting in serious impairment of a body function 5 333.17764(6) Pub saf C Adulterating, misbranding, removing, or substituting a drug or device resulting in death 15 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 333.17766c(2)(b) CS G Possessing more than 12 grams ephedrine or pseudoephedrine 2 333.17766c(2)(c) CS E Purchasing or possessing ephedrine or pseudoephedrine knowing or having reason to know that it is to be used to manufacture methamphetamine 5 333.20142(5) Pub trst F False statement in application for licensure as health facility 4 333.20153 Pub saf D Reuse of single-use medical device 10 333.20175b(3) Pub trst G Medical record â intentional omission of certain medical services â health facility or agency 2 333.21792 Pub trst G Nursing home accepting referral fees, bribing officials, or accepting bribes 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 333.26424(l) Pub trst G Selling marihuana in violation of registry identification card restrictions 2 333.26600(1) Person B Altering or forging request for medication to end patient's life, or concealing or destroying rescission of that request, with intent to cause patient's death 20 333.26600(2) Â Person B Coercing or exerting undue influence on patient to request medication to end patient's life, or to destroy rescission of that request, for purpose of ending patient's life 20 333.27407a(c) Pub saf F Operating medical marihuana facility without a license resulting in death or serious injury 4 Sec. 16p. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 750.317 Person M2 Second degree murder Life 750.317a Person A Delivery of controlled substance causing death Life 750.321 Person C Manslaughter 15 750.322 Person C Willful killing of unborn quick child 15 750.327 Person A Death by explosives on vehicle or vessel Life 750.328 Person A Death by explosives in or near building Life 750.329 Person C Homicide â weapon aimed with intent but not malice 15 750.329a Person E Assisting a suicide 5 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06030'26) or House Bill No. 5825 (request no. H06030'26) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.